Wisconsin, session 2025, SB990.
do enact as follows:SB990,11Section 1. 48.49 of the statutes is created to read:SB990,2,5248.49 State or federal benefits of a child in out-of-home care. (1) If the 3department or county department is appointed as representative payee for a child 4in out-of-home care who receives state or federal benefits, the department or county 5department shall do all the following:SB990,2,76(a) Consistent with the best interests of the child, conserve the child’s benefits 7in protected accounts that avoid asset limitations for federal and state programs. SB990,2,118(b) Provide a periodic accounting to the child, the child’s attorney or guardian 9ad litem, and the child’s parent, guardian, or Indian custodian regarding the 10conservation and use of the child’s benefits while the child is in the department or 11county department’s care.SB990,2,1412(c) Work with the child and the appropriate federal agency to return 13remaining funds to the child or another fiduciary once the child exits out-of-home 14care. SB990,2,1615(2) The department may take any necessary steps to facilitate statewide 16compliance with this section.SB990,2,2017(3) The department or a county department may contract with a public or 18private agency to fulfill the requirements of this section. The department may 19contract with a public or private agency to fulfill the requirements of this section on 20behalf of a county department. SB990,3,221(4) State or federal benefits received by the department or a county 1department on behalf of a child may not be used by the department or a county 2department to pay for the costs of caring for the child in out-of-home care.SB990,3,33